Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-594.
Net energy metering provisions.

The Commission shall establish by regulation a program that affords eligible customer-generators the opportunity to participate in net energy metering, and a program, to begin no later than July 1, 2014, for customers of investor-owned utilities and to
begin no later than July 1, 2015, and to end July 1, 2019, for customers of electric cooperatives as provided in subsection G, to afford eligible agricultural customer-generators the opportunity to participate in net energy metering.
The regulations may include, but need not be limited to, requirements for (i) retail sellers; (ii) owners or operators of distribution or transmission facilities; (iii) providers of default service; (iv) eligible customer-generators;
(v) eligible agricultural customer-generators; or (vi) any combination of the foregoing, as the Commission determines will facilitate the provision of net energy metering, provided that the Commission determines that such requirements
do not adversely affect the public interest. On and after July 1, 2017, small agricultural generators or eligible agricultural customer-generators may elect to interconnect pursuant to the provisions of this section or as small
agricultural generators pursuant to § 56-594.2, but not both. Existing eligible agricultural customer-generators may elect to become small agricultural generators, but may not revert to being eligible agricultural customer-generators
after such election. On and after July 1, 2019, interconnection of eligible agricultural customer-generators shall cease for electric cooperatives only, and such facilities shall interconnect solely as small agricultural generators.
For electric cooperatives, eligible agricultural customer-generators whose renewable energy generating facilities were interconnected before July 1, 2019, may continue to participate in net energy metering pursuant to this section
for a period not to exceed 25 years from the date of their renewable energy generating facility’s original interconnection.

For the purpose of this section:“Eligible agricultural customer-generator” means a customer that operates a renewable energy generating facility as part of an agricultural business, which generating facility (i) uses as its sole energy source solar power,
wind power, or aerobic or anaerobic digester gas, (ii) does not have an aggregate generation capacity of more than 500 kilowatts, (iii) is located on land owned or controlled by the agricultural business, (iv) is connected to the
customer’s wiring on the customer’s side of its interconnection with the distributor; (v) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric company’s transmission and distribution facilities, and (vi) is used primarily
to provide energy to metered accounts of the agricultural business. An eligible agricultural customer-generator may be served by multiple meters serving the eligible agricultural customer-generator that are located at the same
or adjacent sites, such that the eligible agricultural customer-generator may aggregate in a single account the electricity consumption and generation measured by the meters, provided that the same utility serves all such meters.
The aggregated load shall be served under the appropriate tariff.“Eligible customer-generator” means a customer that owns and operates, or contracts with other persons to own, operate, or both, an electrical generating facility
that (i) has a capacity of not more than 25 kilowatts for residential customers and not more than three megawatts for nonresidential customers; (ii) uses as its total source of fuel renewable energy, as defined in § 56-576; (iii)
is located on land owned or leased by the customer and is connected to the customer’s wiring on the customer’s side of its interconnection with the distributor; (iv) is interconnected and operated in parallel with an electric company’s
transmission and distribution facilities; and (v) is intended primarily to offset all or part of the customer’s own electricity requirements. In addition to the electrical generating facility size limitations in clause (i), the
capacity of any generating facility installed under this section between July 1, 2015, and July 1, 2020, shall not exceed the expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized
calculation of billing history if 12 months of billing history is not available. In addition to the electrical generating facility size limitation in clause (i), in the certificated service territory of a Phase I Utility, the capacity
of any generating facility installed under this section after July 1, 2020, shall not exceed 100 percent of the expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized calculation
of billing history if 12 months of billing history is not available, and in the certificated service territory of a Phase II Utility, the capacity of any generating facility installed under this section after July 1, 2020, shall
not exceed 150 percent of the expected annual energy consumption based on the previous 12 months of billing history or an annualized calculation of billing history if 12 months of billing history is not available.“Net energy metering”
means measuring the difference, over the net metering period, between (i) electricity supplied to an eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator from the electric grid and (ii) the electricity generated
and fed back to the electric grid by the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator.“Net metering period” means the 12-month period following the date of final interconnection of the eligible customer-generator’s
or eligible agricultural customer-generator’s system with an electric service provider, and each 12-month period thereafter.“Small agricultural generator” has the same meaning that is ascribed to that term in § 56-594.2.

The Commission’s regulations shall ensure that (i) the metering equipment installed for net metering shall be capable of measuring the flow of electricity in two directions and (ii) any eligible customer-generator seeking to participate in net energy
metering shall notify its supplier and receive approval to interconnect prior to installation of an electrical generating facility. The electric distribution company shall have 30 days from the date of notification for residential
facilities, and 60 days from the date of notification for nonresidential facilities, to determine whether the interconnection requirements have been met. Such regulations shall allocate fairly the cost of such equipment and any
necessary interconnection. An eligible customer-generator’s electrical generating system, and each electrical generating system of an eligible agricultural customer-generator, shall meet all applicable safety and performance standards
established by the National Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and accredited testing laboratories such as Underwriters Laboratories. Beyond the requirements set forth in this section and to
ensure public safety, power quality, and reliability of the supplier’s electric distribution system, an eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator whose electrical generating system meets those standards
and rules shall bear all reasonable costs of equipment required for the interconnection to the supplier’s electric distribution system, including costs, if any, to (a) install additional controls, (b) perform or pay for additional
tests, and (c) purchase additional liability insurance.

The Commission shall establish minimum requirements for contracts to be entered into by the parties to net metering arrangements. Such requirements shall protect the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator against discrimination
by virtue of its status as an eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator, and permit customers that are served on time-of-use tariffs that have electricity supply demand charges contained within the
electricity supply portion of the time-of-use tariffs to participate as an eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator. Notwithstanding the cost allocation provisions of subsection C, eligible customer-generators
or eligible agricultural customer-generators served on demand charge-based time-of-use tariffs shall bear the incremental metering costs required to net meter such customers.

If electricity generated by an eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator over the net metering period exceeds the electricity consumed by the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator, the customer-generator
or eligible agricultural customer-generator shall be compensated for the excess electricity if the entity contracting to receive such electric energy and the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator
enter into a power purchase agreement for such excess electricity. Upon the written request of the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator, the supplier that serves the eligible customer-generator
or eligible agricultural customer-generator shall enter into a power purchase agreement with the requesting eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator that is consistent with the minimum requirements
for contracts established by the Commission pursuant to subsection D. The power purchase agreement shall obligate the supplier to purchase such excess electricity at the rate that is provided for such purchases in a net metering
standard contract or tariff approved by the Commission, unless the parties agree to a higher rate. The eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator owns any renewable energy certificates associated with
its electrical generating facility; however, at the time that the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator enters into a power purchase agreement with its supplier, the eligible customer-generator
or eligible agricultural customer-generator shall have a one-time option to sell the renewable energy certificates associated with such electrical generating facility to its supplier and be compensated at an amount that is established
by the Commission to reflect the value of such renewable energy certificates. Nothing in this section shall prevent the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator and the supplier from voluntarily entering
into an agreement for the sale and purchase of excess electricity or renewable energy certificates at mutually-agreed upon prices if the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator does not exercise
its option to sell its renewable energy certificates to its supplier at Commission-approved prices at the time that the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator enters into a power purchase agreement
with its supplier. All costs incurred by the supplier to purchase excess electricity and renewable energy certificates from eligible customer-generators or eligible agricultural customer-generators shall be recoverable through
its Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard (RPS) rate adjustment clause, if the supplier has a Commission-approved RPS plan. If not, then all costs shall be recoverable through the supplier’s fuel adjustment clause. For purposes of
this section, “all costs” shall be defined as the rates paid to the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator for the purchase of excess electricity and renewable energy certificates and any administrative
costs incurred to manage the eligible customer-generator’s or eligible agricultural customer-generator’s power purchase arrangements. The net metering standard contract or tariff shall be available to eligible customer-generators
or eligible agricultural customer-generators on a first-come, first-served basis in each electric distribution company’s Virginia service area until the rated generating capacity owned and operated by eligible customer-generators,
eligible agricultural customer-generators, and small agricultural generators in the Commonwealth reaches six percent, in the aggregate, five percent of which is available to all customers and one percent of which is available only
to low-income utility customers of each electric distribution company’s adjusted Virginia peak-load forecast for the previous year, and shall require the supplier to pay the eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural
customer-generator for such excess electricity in a timely manner at a rate to be established by the Commission.On and after the earlier of (i) 2024 for a Phase I Utility or 2025 for a Phase II Utility or (ii) when the aggregate
rated generating capacity owned and operated by eligible customer-generators, eligible agricultural customer-generators, and small agricultural generators in the Commonwealth reaches three percent of a Phase I or Phase II Utility’s
adjusted Virginia peak-load forecast for the previous year, the Commission shall conduct a net energy metering proceeding.In any net energy metering proceeding, the Commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, evaluate
and establish (a) an amount customers shall pay on their utility bills each month for the costs of using the utility’s infrastructure; (b) an amount the utility shall pay to appropriately compensate the customer, as determined
by the Commission, for the total benefits such facilities provide; (c) the direct and indirect economic impact of net metering to the Commonwealth; and (d) any other information the Commission deems relevant. The Commission shall
establish an appropriate rate structure related thereto, which shall govern compensation related to all eligible customer-generators, eligible agricultural customer-generators, and small agricultural generators, except low-income
utility customers, that interconnect after the effective date established in the Commission’s final order. Nothing in the Commission’s final order shall affect any eligible customer-generators, eligible agricultural customer-generators,
and small agricultural generators who interconnect before the effective date of such final order. As part of the net energy metering proceeding, the Commission shall evaluate the six percent aggregate net metering cap and may,
if appropriate, raise or remove such cap. The Commission shall enter its final order in such a proceeding no later than 12 months after it commences such proceeding, and such final order shall establish a date by which the new
terms and conditions shall apply for interconnection and shall also provide that, if the terms and conditions of compensation in the final order differ from the terms and conditions available to customers before the proceeding,
low-income utility customers may interconnect under whichever terms are most favorable to them.

Any residential eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator, in the service territory of a Phase II Utility who owns and operates, or contracts with other persons to own, operate, or both, an electrical generating facility
with a capacity that exceeds 15 kilowatts shall pay to its supplier, in addition to any other charges authorized by law, a monthly standby charge. The amount of the standby charge and the terms and conditions under which it is
assessed shall be in accordance with a methodology developed by the supplier and approved by the Commission. The Commission shall approve a supplier’s proposed standby charge methodology if it finds that the standby charges collected
from all such eligible customer-generators and eligible agricultural customer-generators allow the supplier to recover only the portion of the supplier’s infrastructure costs that are properly associated with serving such eligible
customer-generators or eligible agricultural customer-generators. Such an eligible customer-generator or eligible agricultural customer-generator shall not be liable for a standby charge until the date specified in an order of
the Commission approving its supplier’s methodology. For customers of all other investor-owned utilities, on and after July 1, 2020, standby charges are prohibited for any residential eligible customer-generator or agricultural
customer-generator.

On and after the later of July 1, 2019, or the effective date of regulations that the Commission is required to adopt pursuant to § 56-594.01, (i) net energy metering in the service territory of each electric cooperative shall be conducted as provided
in a program implemented pursuant to § 56-594.01 and (ii) the provisions of this section shall not apply to net energy metering in the service territory of an electric cooperative except as provided in § 56-594.01.

The Commission may adopt such rules or establish such guidelines as may be necessary for its general administration of this section.

When the Commission conducts a net energy metering proceeding, it shall:

Investigate and determine the costs and benefits of the current net energy metering program;

Establish an appropriate netting measurement interval for a successor tariff that is just and reasonable in light of the costs and benefits of the net metering program in aggregate, and applicable to new requests for net energy metering service; and

Determine a specific avoided cost for customer-generators, the different type of customer-generator technologies where the Commission deems it appropriate, and establish the methodology for determining the compensation rate for any net excess generation
determined according to the applicable net measurement interval for any new tariff.

In evaluating the costs and benefits of the net energy metering program, the Commission shall consider:

The aggregate impact of customer-generators on the electric utility’s long-run marginal costs of generation, distribution, and transmission;

The cost of service implications of customer-generators on other customers within the same class, including an evaluation of whether customer-generators provide an adequate rate of return to the electrical utility compared to the otherwise applicable
rate class when, for analytical purposes only, examined as a separate class within a cost of service study;

The direct and indirect economic impact of the net energy metering program to the Commonwealth; and

Any other information it deems relevant, including environmental and resilience benefits of customer-generator facilities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, § 56-585.1:8, or any other provision of law to the contrary, any locality that is a nonjurisdictional customer of a Phase II Utility, as defined in § 56-585.1:3, and is in Planning District Eight with a
population greater than 1 million may (i) install solar-powered or wind-powered electric generation facilities with a rated capacity not exceeding five megawatts, whether the facilities are owned by the locality or owned and operated
by a third party pursuant to a contract with the locality, on any locality-owned site within the locality and (ii) credit the electricity generated at any such facility as directed by the governing body of the locality to any one
or more of the metered accounts of buildings or other facilities of the locality or the locality’s public school division that are located within the locality, without regard to whether the buildings and facilities are located
at the same site where the electric generation facility is located or at a site contiguous thereto. The amount of the credit for such electricity to the metered accounts of the locality or its public school division shall be identical,
with respect to the rate structure, all retail rate components, and monthly charges, to the amount the locality or public school division would otherwise be charged for such amount of electricity under its contract with the public
utility, without the assessment by the public utility of any distribution charges, service charges, or fees in connection with or arising out of such crediting.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2004, c. 827; 2006, c. 470; 2007, cc. 877, 888, 933; 2009, c. 804; 2011, c. 239; 2013, c. 268; 2015, cc. 431, 432; 2017, cc. 565, 581; 2019, cc. 742, 763; 2020, cc. 1187, 1188, 1189, 1193, 1194, 1239.

Cross references.

As to local regulation of solar facilities, see §

15.2-2288.7

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, cc. 565 and 581, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall conduct a single docketed proceeding to implement the provisions of this act. The proceeding shall be initiated between August 1, 2017, and December 1, 2017. The
proceeding shall provide notice to the public and an opportunity for public comment. A final order amending or adopting regulations under §§ 56-578, 56-594, as amended by this act, and 56-594.1 of the Code of Virginia that the Commission
deems necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act shall be issued not later than June 1, 2018. Utilities shall be required to each make a compliance filing, containing a schedule to accommodate small agricultural generators,
to the Commission for administrative approval not sooner than three months following the issuance of the Commission’s order amending or adopting regulations under this enactment. Utilities shall not be required to undergo rate proceedings
or individual proceedings of any kind to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 17 provides: “That each Phase I Utility and each Phase II Utility, as such terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall investigate potential improvements to the net energy metering programs
as provided under § 56-594 of the Code of Virginia, potential improvements to the pilot programs for community solar development as provided under § 56-585.1:3 of the Code of Virginia, expansion of options for customers with corporate
clean energy procurement targets, and impediments to the siting of new renewable energy projects. Each such utility shall include interested stakeholders in the investigation of such issues and the development of proposed legislation
and shall issue a report of its findings to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor by November 1, 2018.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 2 provides: “That no later than 60 days after the effective date of this act each Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall convene a stakeholder process to
make recommendations to the utility concerning (i) the development of retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing that take advantage of advanced metering technology and related investments in customer information
systems; (ii) the development of incentive programs for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers using advanced metering technology served under such time-varying rate schedules;
(iii) the possible transition of net metering customers using advanced metering technology to the time-varying rate schedules; (iv) peak shaving programs; (v) the provision of on-site distributed renewable generation to multifamily
dwellings; and (vi) related system effects and requirements arising from distributed generation resources. An independent facilitator with expertise in rate design, cost recovery, and solar markets, compensated by the utility, offset
by such contributions from members of the stakeholder group as the members deem appropriate, shall facilitate such stakeholder process. The utility shall consult with the stakeholder group and the State Corporation Commission prior
to engaging the independent facilitator. Such stakeholder process shall include representatives from the utility, the State Corporation Commission, the office of Consumer Counsel of the Attorney General, the Department of Mines, Minerals
and Energy, net-metering program administrators, customer-generators, agricultural customer-generators, solar energy program implementers, solar energy providers, energy efficiency advocates, other residential and small business customers,
and any other interested stakeholder who the utility deems appropriate for inclusion in such process. The utility shall report on the status of the work of the stakeholder group and the programs developed in conjunction with such stakeholder
group, including the petitions filed and the determination thereon, to the Governor, the State Corporation Commission, and the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor on January 1, 2020, and thereafter on
January 1 of each successive year. The scope of the work of the stakeholder group convened pursuant to this enactment shall include the following:

“1. In developing the retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing that take advantage of advanced metering technology, the stakeholder group shall include at least one non-demand schedule.

“2. In developing incentive programs for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers using advanced metering technology served under such time-varying rate schedules, the stakeholder group shall seek to
accelerate solar development without adversely impacting other non-solar customers and to establish appropriate incentives to sustain the program, including consideration of the expiration of federal tax incentives available. Any such
incentive program shall be limited to net-metering customers until other customers receive advanced metering technology.

“3. In developing recommendations for the possible transition of net metering customers to the time-varying rate schedules, the stakeholder group shall (i) recommend the timing and increases in the net-metering cap to take advantage of the deployment
of advanced metering technology and the approval of time-varying rate schedules, in a range estimated to be between two percent and four percent, and (ii) recommend appropriate increases in customer class caps, aligned with potential
system cap increases, and the timing of deployment of advanced metering technology, taking into consideration infrastructure costs and rate impacts of higher solar distributed generation capacity. The stakeholder group shall recommend
capacity and market milestones for growth of solar distributed generation capacity.

“4. The stakeholder group shall develop recommendations related to distributed generation resources, including rate design options for the possible transition from retail net metering to successor time-varying rate schedules, recognizing the dependency
of such rate design to the deployment of advanced metering technology. The stakeholder group design shall encourage rate stability and allow sufficient transition time for customer education. The stakeholder group shall seek to encourage
voluntary transition to time-varying rate schedules and shall provide mechanisms to gather data from such early adopters in order to minimize program impacts on existing net metering customers and other ratepayers. The stakeholder
group shall make recommendations about the appropriate grandfathering of existing net metering customers who elect not to be served under the time-varying rate schedules.

“5. The stakeholder group may address the availability of power purchase agreements, standby and demand charges, Schedule 19 PURPA contracts, distributed generation storage deployment, and other topics that the facilitator deems appropriate.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 3 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
retail rate schedules designed to offer time-varying pricing, including at least one non-demand rate schedule. Customer-generators or agricultural customer-generators participating in net metering may elect to be served under such
time-varying rate schedule at such time as the customer-generator or agricultural customer-generator is served by advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to the utility.”

Acts 2019, cc. 742 and 763, cl. 4 provides: “That on or before March 1, 2020, a Phase II Utility, as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, shall develop and submit to the State Corporation Commission for approval
an incentive program for the installation of equipment to develop electric energy derived from sunlight for customers served under time-varying retail rate schedules that have advanced-metering technology equipment satisfactory to
the utility.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 8 provides: “That should the State Corporation Commission amend rules pursuant to the provisions of § 56-594 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, it shall set forth rules for net energy metering at electric
cooperatives in a new and separate chapter of the Virginia Administrative Code.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 827 substituted “500” for “twenty-five” in clause (i) in the definition of “Eligible customer-generator” in subsection B and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 470, in subsection B, in the definition of “Eligible customer-generator,” inserted “or contracts with other persons to own, operate, or both,” substituted “renewable energy, as defined in § 56-576” for “solar, wind, or hydro energy”
in clause (ii), and substituted clause (iii) for “(iii) is located on the customer’s premises”; and in subsection C, deleted “solar, wind or hydro” preceding “electrical generating system” in the second and third sentences and substituted
“an eligible” for “a” in the third sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 877 divided former subsection D into present subsections D and E by substituting “If electricity” for “Where electricity”; in subsection E, in the first sentence, substituted “an eligible” for “the,” deleted “not” preceding “be
compensated” and substituted “if” for “unless,” inserted the second and third sentences and added the language beginning “and shall require the default” to the end.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and substituted “one percent” for “0.1 percent” in the last sentence of subsection D [now E].

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 804, in subsection A, substituted “that affords” for “which affords”; in subsection B, inserted “unless a utility elects a higher capacity limit for such a facility”; in subsection D, added the language beginning “and permit customers”;
in subsection E, in the second sentence, substituted “Upon” for “If the eligible customer-generator receives generation service from a default service provider, the default service provider, upon” and inserted “the supplier that serves
the eligible customer-generator”; in the third sentence, substituted “supplier” for “default service provider,” added the fourth through eighth sentences, and in the last sentence, substituted “supplier” for “default service provider.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 239, in subsection B, substituted “20 kilowatts” for “10 kilowatts” in the definition for “Eligible customer-generator”; and added subsection F.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 268 inserted “or eligible agricultural customer-generator” throughout the section; and in subsection A, deleted “to begin no later than July 1, 2000” following “regulation a program” inserted “and a program, to begin no later
than July 1, 2014, for customers of investor-owned utilities and no later than July 1, 2015, for customers of electric cooperatives, to afford eligible agricultural customer-generators the opportunity to participate in net energy metering,”
substituted “owners or” for “owners and/or” at the beginning of clause (ii), added clause (v), and redesignated former clause (v) as (vi); in subsection B, added the paragraph defining “Eligible agricultural customer-generator”; in
subsection C, substituted “Such regulations shall” for “and shall” in the second sentence, inserted “and each electrical generating system of an eligible agricultural customer-generator” and substituted clause (a) through (c) for former
clause (i) through (iii); in subsection D, in the second sentence, inserted “eligible,” and substituted “as an eligible” for “as a”; in subsection E, substituted “any renewable” for “the renewable” in the fourth sentence; and made
punctuation changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 431 and 432 are identical, and in the definition for “Eligible customer-generator” in subsection B, substituted “not more than one megawatt for nonresidential customers on an electrical generating facility placed in service
after July 1, 2015” for “500 kilowatts for nonresidential customers unless a utility elects a higher capacity limit for such a facility” and added the second sentence; in subsection C, inserted the clause (i) designation, and added
clause (ii) in the first sentence, added the second sentence, inserted “and to ensure public safety, power quality, and reliability of the supplier’s electric distribution system” and substituted “all reasonable costs of equipment
required for the interconnection to the supplier’s electric distribution system, including costs, if any” for “the reasonable cost, if any, as determined by the Commission” in the fifth sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 565 and 581 are identical, and added the last four sentences in subsection A; added the “Small agricultural generator” definition in subsection B; and in the last sentence of subsection E, inserted “and small agricultural generators”
and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 742 and 763 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “to begin” preceding “no later than July 1, 2015” and inserted “and to end July 1, 2019” preceding “for customers,” and inserted “as provided in subsection G”; in subsection
E, substituted “Commonwealth” for “state,” and inserted “(the systemwide cap)” in the last sentence; added subsection G; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1187, 1188, 1189, and 1239 are identical, and in subsection B in the definition for “Eligible agricultural customer-generator” in the penultimate sentence, inserted “serving the eligible agricultural customer-generator” and
substituted “the same or adjacent” for “separate but contiguous”; in the definition for “Eligible customer-generator” in the first sentence in clause (i), substituted ‘’25 kilowatts” for ‘’20 kilowatts” and “three megawatts” for “one
megawatt” and deleted “on an electrical generating facility placed in service after July 1, 2015” at the end; and in clause (iii), substituted “land owned or leased by the customer” for “the customer’s premises”; in the second sentence,
substituted “between July 1, 2015, and July 1, 2020” for “after July 1, 2015” and added the final sentence; in subsection E, in the first paragraph in the last sentence, substituted “six percent, in the aggregate, five percent of which
is available to all customers and one percent of which is available only to low-income utility customers” for “one percent”; and added the second and third paragraphs; in subsection F in the first sentence, inserted “in the service
territory of a Phase II Utility” and substituted “15 kilowatts” for “10 kilowatts” and added the last sentence; and added subsections H through K.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1193 and 1194 are identical, and in the definition for “Eligible customer-generator” in the first sentence in clause (i), substituted “25 kilowatts” for “20 kilowatts” and “three megawatts” for “one megawatt” and added the final
sentence; in subsection E, in the first paragraph in the last sentence, substituted “six percent, in the aggregate, five percent of which is available to all customers and one percent of which is available only to low-income utility
customers” for “one percent” and “the previous year” for “the previous year (the systemwide cap)”; and added the second and third paragraphs; in subsection F in the first sentence, substituted “15 kilowatts” for “10 kilowatts”; and
added subsections H through J. The section has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For comment, “My Two Cents Per Kilowatt-Hour: Virginia’s Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 755 (2007).